District of Columbia statutes.
22-3156

Jurisdiction.

There is jurisdiction to prosecute any person who participates in the commission of any offense described in this chapter if any act in furtherance of the offense occurs in the District of Columbia or where the effect of any act in furtherance of the offense occurs in the District of Columbia.

History

Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-194, § 106, 49 DCR 5306